test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    kuvviistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuvviistâlâm
    kuvzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuvzâm
    kuvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuvâttâlâm
    kuádáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuádáttâlâm
    kuáivudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáivudâđâm
    kuásuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuásuttâlâm
    kuásástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuásástâlâm
    kuáđástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáđástâlâm
    kuškiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškiidâđâm
    kuškâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškâdâđâm
    kuškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuškâm
    kuškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: košká
    kužâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kužâdâđâm
    kužžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuužâm
    káhvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: káhvástâlâm
    kákkásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kákkásâd
    kákkásâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kákkásâđâm
    kámppádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kámppádâlâm
    kárvudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kárvudâđâm
    käskittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käskittâđâm
    kävilâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kävilâšâm
    laannjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laanjâm
    laannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laanâm
    laannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lááná
    laađđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laađâm
    laddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láddá
    lahtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laavtâm
    lahtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láhtá
    laimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laaimâm
    laimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láimá
    laitâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laitâččâđâm
    lappuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lappuustâlâm
    lapâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lapâččâđâm
    lavdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laavdâm
    lavdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lávdá
    lavliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lavliistâlâm
    lavvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laavâm
    lavvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lávvá
    lađâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lađâstâlâm
    leggistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leggistât
    leirâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leirâdâđâm
    leirâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leirâstâlâm
    lekkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leehâm
    lekkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liäkká
    liennjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lienjâm
    liennjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liänjá
    lihâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lihâttâlâm
    lijkkuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lijkkuustâlâm
    likkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liihâm
    litodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: litodâđâm
    livkkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livkkáástâlâm
    liässáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liässáástâlâm
    liävuttuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liävuttudâm
    loggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loogâm
    loigânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loigânâd
    loigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: looigâm
    loommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loomâm
    loommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lama
    lopedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lopedâđâm
    loskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: looskâm
    loskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laska
    loskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laskeh
    ložžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loožâm
    ložžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luážžá
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luhâluuvčâm
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luhâluš
    luobdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luobdâm
    luoddiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoddiistâlâm
    luoddânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luoddânâd
    luohčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luovčâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoihâm
    luoimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoimâm
    luoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luovâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lohá
    luuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lopá
    luvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâttâlâm
    luáštádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luáštádâđâm
    luškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuškâm
    luškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lošká
    láittádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láittádâđâm
    láškuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láškuttâlâm
    lášmuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lášmuttâlâm
    maannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maanâm
    maannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máánáá
    maaššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maašâm
    maaššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máášá
    maccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maacâm
    mainâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mainâstâlâm
    maizâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maaizâm
    majettuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: majettudâm
    maldâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máldá
    manâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: manâttât
    markkânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: markkânâšâm
    miehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mievâm
    mieigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mieigâm
    mieskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mieskâm
    mieskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: miäská
    miestâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miestâm
    miestâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: miästá
    miettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mieđâm
    miähástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miähástâlâm
    miäruštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miäruštâlâm
    mohástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mohástâlâm
    monâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâttâlâm
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moonâm
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ibárdâs
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mana
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilán
    moorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moorâm
    moorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muárá
    mostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moostâm
    mostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: masta
    muggâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muggârušâm
    muhâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muhâttâlâm
    muijâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muijâsâdâm
    mulâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mulâdâđâm
    mulâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mulâdâđáin
    muollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muálá
    muovlâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muovlâm
    murdelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: murdelâđâm
    muullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muulâm
    muullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: molá
    muuttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: motá
    muálháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muálháttâlâm
    muátástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muátástâl
    muštottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštottâlâm
    muštástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštástâlâm
    mučástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučástâlâm
    málástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: málástâlâm
    máttááttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máttááttâlâm
    mávustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mávustâlâm
    mávustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mávustâl
    mášuttuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttudâm
    mášuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttâđâm
    naaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naajâm
    naaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: náájá
    naallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naalâm
    nabdastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nabdastâlâm
    nahettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nahettâđâm
    nalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naalgâm
    nalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nálgá
    napâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: napâlâšâm
    nievdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nievdâm
    niirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niirâm
    niirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nirá
    nijbástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nijbástâlâm
    nimmâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nimmârušâm
    niälgáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niälgárušâm
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavâm
    njaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaamâm
    njaskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaaskâm
    njavkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavhâm
    njeeijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njeejâm
    njeđgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäđgá
    njieccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiesâm
    njiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njielâm
    njiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiälá
    njiihâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiivâm
    njiittâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiiđâm
    njipčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njipčá
    njolccâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njolccâdâđâm
    njomâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njomâstâlâm
    njooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoosâm
    njooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaca
    njoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoolâm
    njoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njala
    njoommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoomâm
    njoommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njama
    njorttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoortâm
    njorttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njartta
    njuobžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuábžá
    njuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuosâm
    njuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuácá
    njuolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuolgâm
    njuolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálgá
    njuordâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuordâm
    njuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuorâm
    njuoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuoskâm
    njuoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuáská
    njuottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuođâm
    njuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuovâm
    njuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuává
    njuođâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuođâdâđâm
    njurgiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgiistâlâm
    njurgottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgottâlâm
    njuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuuvâm
    njuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njopá
    njuáludâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuáludât
    njuárustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuárustâlâm
    njálgástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njálgástâlâm
    noccedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noccedâđâm
    noigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nooigâm
    nooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noojâm
    noollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noolâm
    noollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nala
    noskáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noskáttâlâm
    nuhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuhâstâlâm
    nukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuuhâm
    nukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nokká
    nuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâm
    nuolttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolttâđâm
    nuolâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâdâđâm
    nuorbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuárbá
    nurdâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdâdâđâm
    nurdâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdâstâlâm
    nurdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuurdâm
    nurdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nordá
    nurvodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvodâđâm
    nurvottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvottâđâm
    nurváástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurváástâlâm
    nurâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurâdâđâm
    nutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuuđhâm
    nutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: notká
    nuuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuuvâm
    nuuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nohá
    nuurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuurâm
    nuáidástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuáidástâlâm
    nággáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nággárušâm
    náguttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: náguttâlâm
    nágáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nágáttâlâm
    oggârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oggârâšâm
    olkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oolhâi
    omâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: omâttâlâm
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oopâm
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáppá
    orniistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orniistâlâm
    orostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostâlâm
    orvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oorvâm
    orvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arva
    oskeldâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskeldâđâm
    oskottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskottâlâm
    ostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oostâm
    ostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: asta
    otânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: otânâšâm
    ovdâháástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdáháástâlâm
    ovdâháástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdâháástâlâm
    oŋâttuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttušâm
    oŋâttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttâšâm
    paaŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paaŋâm
    paccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paacâm
    paddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paadâm
    paddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: páddá
    paimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paaimâm
    pajadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pajadâlâm
    paldattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paldattâlâm
    palgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paalgâm
    pallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paalâm
    pamppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paampâm
    pamppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pámppá
    parâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parâttâlâm
    pasniistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pasniistâlâm
    patârâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: patârâd
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačâluuvčâm
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pačâlâhš
    peerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peerâm
    peerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piärá
    peessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peesâm
    peessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juolgij
    peessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäsá
    peettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peeđâm
    peettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piätá
    peittâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâdâđâm
    peittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâđâm
    pekkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäkká
    pelhittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pelhittâđâm
    petittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: petittât
    pevviruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pevvirušâm
    pieggiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieggiistâlâm
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piejâm
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joton
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurdui
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meddâl
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäjá
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárkán
    piemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piemâm
    piemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piämmá
    piergiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piergiittâlâm
    pievlâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piävlá
    pieđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieđâm
    piiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piisâm
    piiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: picá
    pijpostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pijpostâlâm
    piruluddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pirulud
    pirundâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pirundâlâm
    piruttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piruttâlâm
    pismárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pismárâšâm
    pisottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pisottâlâm
    pivâstuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivâstudâm
    piäittáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäittáástâlâm
    piälhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälhástâlâm
    piälháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälháttâlâm
    poggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poogâm
    poigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paiga
    pokkiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pokkiidâdâm
    pokkiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pokkiidâđâm
    polgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poolgâm
    polgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puálgá
    poollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poolâm
    poollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pala
    poossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poosâm
    poossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liitijd
    poossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paanijd
    porfâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: porfâsâdâm
    porgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poorgâm
    porgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: parga
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posoluuvčâm
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posolâhš
    posâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâdâđâm
    posâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâdât
    posâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâlâd
    posâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâlââvčâm
    posâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâlâhš
    povvâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povvâstâlâm
    povčâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povčâstâlâm
